Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF640.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.607, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Election judge party affiliation. new text end new text begin The party affiliation of election judges is classified as provided in section 204B.21, subdivision 4. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Election judge major party affiliation; data classification. new text end new text begin (a) Each appointing authority must maintain a list of all election judges that indicates the major political party affiliation of each election judge or a statement that the judge does not affiliate with a major political party. A list created under this paragraph is public data on individuals. new text end new text begin (b) The lists described in subdivisions 1 and 2 are not public data on individuals. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.21, subdivision 3, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-01358 204B.21 APPOINTMENT OF ELECTION JUDGES. Subd. 3. Access to election judge party affiliation. Notwithstanding section 13.43, the major political party affiliation of an election judge or a statement that the judge does not affiliate with a major political party may be shared with other election judges assigned to the precinct at the same election, to verify compliance with party balance requirements. This data may not be disclosed or used by the election judges for any other purpose.